Nebraska, session 109, LB1015.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-602, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-602 For purposes of the Employment Security Law, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Agricultural labor means services performed:
(a) On a farm, in the employ of any employer, in connection with
cultivating the soil or in connection with raising or harvesting any
agricultural or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing,
feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees,
poultry, fur-bearing animals, and wildlife;
(b) In the employ of the owner, tenant, or other operator of a farm,
in connection with the operation, management, conservation, improvement,
or maintenance of such farm and its tools and equipment or in salvaging
timber or clearing land of brush and other debris left by a windstorm, if
the major part of such service is performed on a farm;
(c) In connection with the production or harvesting of any commodity
in connection with the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals,
reservoirs, or waterways, not owned or operated for profit, used
exclusively for supplying and storing water for farming purposes;
(d)(i) In the employ of the operator of a farm in handling,
planting, drying, packing, packaging, processing, freezing, grading,
storing, or delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for
transportation to market, in its unmanufactured state, any agricultural
or horticultural commodity, but only if such operator produced more than
one-half of the commodity with respect to which such service is
performed, or (ii) in the employ of a group of operators of farms, or a
cooperative organization of which such operators are members, in the
performance of service described in subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this
section, but only if such operators produced more than one-half of the
commodity with respect to which such service is performed. Subdivisions
(1)(d)(i) and (ii) of this section shall not be deemed to be applicable
-2-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
with respect to service performed in connection with commercial canning
or commercial freezing or in connection with any agricultural or
horticultural commodity after its delivery to a terminal market for
distribution for consumption; or
(e) On a farm operated for profit if such service is not in the
course of the employer's trade or business;
(2) Base period means the first four of the last five completed
calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of an individual's
benefit year, except that if the individual is not monetarily eligible
for unemployment benefits as determined pursuant to section 48-627.01
based upon wages paid during the first four of the five most recently
completed calendar quarters, the department shall make a redetermination
of monetary eligibility based upon an alternative base period which
consists of the last four completed calendar quarters immediately
preceding the first day of the claimant's benefit year;
(3) Benefits means the money payments payable to an individual with
respect to his or her unemployment;
(4) Benefit year, with respect to any individual, means the one-year
period beginning with the first day of the first week with respect to
which the individual first files a valid claim for benefits, and
thereafter the one-year period beginning with the first day of the first
week with respect to which the individual next files a valid claim for
benefits after the termination of his or her last preceding benefit year.
Any claim for benefits made in accordance with section 48-629 shall be
deemed to be a valid claim for the purpose of this subdivision if the
individual has been paid the wages for insured work required under
section 48-627.01. For the purposes of this subdivision a week with
respect to which an individual files a valid claim shall be deemed to be
in, within, or during that benefit year which includes the greater part
of such week;
(5) Calendar quarter means the period of three consecutive calendar
-3-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
months ending on March 31, June 30, September 30, or December 31, or the
equivalent thereof as the Commissioner of Labor may by rule and
regulation prescribe;
(6) Client means any individual, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, or other legally recognized entity that contracts
with a professional employer organization to obtain professional employer
services relating to worksite employees through a professional employer
agreement;
(7) Combined tax means the employer liability consisting of
contributions and the state unemployment insurance tax;
(8) Combined tax rate means the rate which is applied to wages to
determine the combined taxes due;
(9) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;
(10) Commodity means an agricultural commodity as defined in section
15(g) of the federal Agricultural Marketing Act, as amended, 12 U.S.C.
1141j;
(11) Contribution rate means the percentage of the combined tax rate
used to determine the contribution portion of the combined tax;
(12) Contributions means that portion of the combined tax based upon
the contribution rate portion of the combined tax rate which is deposited
in the state Unemployment Compensation Fund as required by sections
48-648 and 48-649 to 48-649.04;
(13) Crew leader means an individual who furnishes individuals to
perform service in agricultural labor for any other person, pays, either
on his or her own behalf or on behalf of such other person, the
individuals so furnished by him or her for the service in agricultural
labor performed by them, and has not entered into a written agreement
with such other person under which such individual is designated as an
employee of such other person;
(14) Department means the Department of Labor;
(15) Employers engaged in the construction industry means all
-4-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
employers primarily engaged in business activities classified as sector
23 business activities under the North American Industry Classification
System;
(16) Employment office means a free public employment office or
branch thereof, operated by this state or maintained as a part of a
state-controlled system of public employment offices, including public
employment offices operated by an agency of a foreign government;
(17) Farm means stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, fur-bearing animal,
and truck farms, plantations, ranches, nurseries, ranges, greenhouses, or
other similar structures used primarily for the raising of agricultural
or horticultural commodities, and orchards;
(18) Fund means the Unemployment Compensation Fund established by
section 48-617 to which all contributions and payments in lieu of
contributions required and from which all benefits provided shall be
paid;
(19) Hearing officer means a person employed by the Department of
Labor who conducts hearings, contested cases, or other proceedings
pursuant to the Employment Security Law;
(20) Hospital means an institution which has been licensed,
certified, or approved by the Department of Health and Human Services as
a hospital;
(21) Insured work means employment for employers;
(22) Leave of absence means any absence from work: (a) Mutually and
voluntarily agreed to by the employer and the employee; (b) mutually and
voluntarily agreed to between the employer and the employee's bargaining
agent; or (c) to which the employee is entitled as a matter of state or
federal law;
(23) Paid vacation leave means a period of time while employed or
following separation from employment in which the individual renders no
services to the employer but is entitled to receive vacation pay equal to
or exceeding his or her base weekly wage;
-5-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
(24) Payments in lieu of contributions means the money payments to
the Unemployment Compensation Fund required by sections 48-649.04,
48-652, 48-660.01, and 48-661;
(25) Professional employer agreement means a written professional
employer services contract whereby:
(a) A professional employer organization agrees to provide payroll
services, employee benefit administration, or personnel services for a
majority of the employees providing services to the client at a client
worksite;
(b) The agreement is intended to be ongoing rather than temporary in
nature; and
(c) Employer responsibilities for worksite employees, including
those of hiring, firing, and disciplining, are shared between the
professional employer organization and the client by contract. The term
professional employer agreement shall not include a contract between a
parent corporation, company, or other entity and a wholly owned
subsidiary;
(26) Professional employer organization means any individual,
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legally
recognized entity that enters into a professional employer agreement with
a client or clients for a majority of a client's workforce at a client
worksite. The term professional employer organization does not include an
insurer as defined in section 44-103 or a temporary help firm;
(27) Standard rate means the rate assigned to category twenty for
that year under section 48-649.03. The standard rate shall be not less
than five and four-tenths percent of the employer's annual taxable
payroll;
(28) State includes, in addition to the states of the United States
of America, any dependency of the United States, the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, and the District of Columbia;
(29) State unemployment insurance tax means that portion of the
-6-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
combined tax which is based upon the state unemployment insurance tax
rate portion of the combined tax rate and which is deposited in the
Workforce Development Program Cash Fund and the Business Innovation Cash
Fund as required by sections 48-648 and 48-649 to 48-649.04;
(30) State unemployment insurance tax rate means the percentage of
the combined tax rate used to determine the state unemployment insurance
tax portion of the combined tax;
(31) Temporary employee means an employee of a temporary help firm
assigned to work for the clients of such temporary help firm;
(32) Temporary help firm means a firm that hires its own employees
and assigns them to clients to support or supplement the client's
workforce in work situations such as employee absences, temporary skill
shortages, seasonal workloads, and special assignments and projects;
(33) Unemployed means an individual during any week in which the
individual performs no service and with respect to which no wages are
payable to the individual or any week of less than full-time work if the
wages payable with respect to such week are less than the individual's
weekly benefit amount, but does not include any individual on a leave of
absence or on paid vacation leave. When an agreement between the employer
and a bargaining unit representative does not allocate vacation pay
allowance or pay in lieu of vacation to a specified period of time during
a period of temporary layoff or plant shutdown, the payment by the
employer or his or her designated representative will be deemed to be
wages as defined in this section in the week or weeks the vacation is
actually taken;
(34) Unemployment Trust Fund means the trust fund in the Treasury of
the United States of America established under section 904 of the federal
Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1104, as such section existed on January
1, 2015, which receives credit from the state Unemployment Compensation
Fund;
(35) Wages, except with respect to services performed in employment
-7-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
as provided in subdivisions (4)(c) and (d) of section 48-604, means all
remuneration for personal services, including commissions and bonuses,
remuneration for personal services paid under a contract of hire, and the
cash value of all remunerations in any medium other than cash. The
reasonable cash value of remuneration in any medium other than cash shall
be estimated and determined in accordance with rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the commissioner. Wages includes tips which
are received while performing services which constitute employment and
which are included in a written statement furnished to the employer
pursuant to section 6053(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in
section 49-801.01.
With respect to services performed in employment in agricultural
labor as is provided in subdivision (4)(c) of section 48-604, wages means
cash remuneration and the cash value of commodities not intended for
personal consumption by the worker and his or her immediate family for
such services. With respect to services performed in employment in
domestic service as is provided in subdivision (4)(d) of section 48-604,
wages means cash remuneration for such services.
The term wages does not include:
(a) The amount of any payment, including any amount paid by an
employer for insurance or annuities or into a fund to provide for such
payment, made to, or on behalf of, an individual in employment or any of
his or her dependents under a plan or system established by an employer
which makes provision for such individuals generally or for a class or
classes of such individuals, including any amount paid by an employer for
insurance or annuities or into a fund to provide for any such payment, on
account of (i) sickness or accident disability, except, in the case of
payments made to an employee or any of his or her dependents, this
subdivision (i) shall exclude from wages only payments which are received
under a workers' compensation law, (ii) medical and hospitalization
expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability, or (iii)
-8-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
death;
(b) The payment by an employer, without deduction from the
remuneration of the employee, of the tax imposed upon an employee under
section 3101 of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section
49-801.01;
(c) Any payment on account of sickness or accident disability, or
medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or
accident disability, made by an employer to, or on behalf of, an
individual after the expiration of six calendar months following the last
calendar month in which such individual worked for such employer;
(d) Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an individual or his or
her beneficiary (i) from or to a trust described in section 401(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 which is exempt
from tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in
section 49-801.01 at the time of such payment unless such payment is made
to an employee of the trust as remuneration for services rendered as such
employee and not as a beneficiary of the trust or (ii) under or to an
annuity plan which, at the time of such payment, meets the requirements
of section 401 of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section
49-801.01;
(e) Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an employee or his or her
beneficiary (i) under a simplified employee pension as defined by the
commissioner, (ii) under or to an annuity contract as defined by the
commissioner, other than a payment for the purchase of such contract
which is made by reason of a salary reduction agreement, whether
evidenced by a written instrument or otherwise, (iii) under or to an
exempt governmental deferred compensation plan as defined by the
commissioner, (iv) to supplement pension benefits under a plan or trust,
as defined by the commissioner, to take into account some portion or all
of the increase in the cost of living since retirement, but only if such
supplemental payments are under a plan which is treated as a welfare
-9-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
plan, or (v) under a cafeteria benefits plan;
(f) Remuneration paid in any medium other than cash to an individual
for service not in the course of the employer's trade or business;
(g) Benefits paid under a supplemental unemployment benefit plan
which satisfies the eight points set forth in Internal Revenue Service
Revenue Ruling 56-249 as the ruling existed on January 1, 2015, and is in
compliance with the standards set forth in Internal Revenue Service
Revenue Rulings 58-128 and 60-330 as the rulings existed on January 1,
2015; and
(h) Remuneration for service performed in the employ of any state in
the exercise of his or her duties as a member of the Army National Guard
or Air National Guard or in the employ of the United States of America as
a member of any military reserve unit;
(36) Week means such period of seven consecutive days as the
commissioner may by rule and regulation prescribe;
(37) Week of unemployment with respect to any individual means any
week during which he or she performs less than full-time work and the
wages payable to him or her with respect to such week are less than his
or her weekly benefit amount;
(38) Wholly owned subsidiary means a corporation, company, or other
entity which has eighty percent or more of its outstanding voting stock
or membership owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the parent
entity; and
(39) Worksite employee has the same meaning as the term covered
employee in section 48-2702.
Sec. 2. Section 48-622.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-622.01 There is hereby created in the state treasury a special
fund to be known as the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund. The fund
terminates on July 1, 2025, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any
money in the fund on such date to the Workforce Development Program Cash
-10-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
Fund. Beginning July 1, 2025, all state unemployment insurance tax
collected under sections 48-648 to 48-661, less refunds, shall be paid
into the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund and the Business
Innovation Cash Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 48-648, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-648 (1) With respect to wages for employment, combined tax shall
accrue and become payable by each employer not otherwise entitled to make
payments in lieu of contributions for each calendar year in which he or
she is subject to the Employment Security Law. Such combined tax shall
become due and be paid by each employer to the commissioner for the
Workforce Development Program Cash Fund, the Business Innovation Cash
Fund, and the Unemployment Trust Fund in such manner and at such times as
the commissioner may, by rule and regulation, prescribe. Such combined
tax shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the wages of
individuals in such employer's employ.
(2) The commissioner may require any employer whose annual payroll
for either of the two preceding calendar years has equaled or exceeded
one hundred thousand dollars to file combined tax returns and pay
combined taxes owed by an electronic method approved by the commissioner,
except when the employer establishes to the satisfaction of the
commissioner that filing the combined tax return or payment of the tax by
an electronic method would create a hardship for the employer.
(3) In the payment of any combined tax, a fractional part of a cent
shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which
case it shall be increased to one cent. If the combined tax due for any
reporting period is less than five dollars, the employer need not remit
the combined tax.
(4) If two or more related corporations or limited liability
companies concurrently employ the same individual and compensate such
individual through a common paymaster which is one of such corporations
-11-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
or limited liability companies, each such corporation or limited
liability company shall be considered to have paid as remuneration to
such individual only the amounts actually disbursed by it to such
individual and shall not be considered to have paid as remuneration to
such individual amounts actually disbursed to such individual by another
of such corporations or limited liability companies. An employee of a
wholly owned subsidiary shall be considered to be concurrently employed
by the parent corporation, company, or other entity and the wholly owned
subsidiary whether or not both companies separately provide remuneration.
(5) The professional employer organization shall report and pay
combined tax, penalties, and interest owed for wages earned by worksite
employees under the client's employer account number using the client's
combined tax rate. The client is liable for the payment of unpaid
combined tax, penalties, and interest owed for wages paid to worksite
employees, and the worksite employees shall be considered employees of
the client for purposes of the Employment Security Law.
(6) The Commissioner of Labor may require by rule and regulation
that each employer subject to the Employment Security Law shall submit to
the commissioner quarterly wage reports on such forms and in such manner
as the commissioner may prescribe. The commissioner may require any
employer whose annual payroll for either of the two preceding calendar
years has equaled or exceeded one hundred thousand dollars to file wage
reports by an electronic method approved by the commissioner, except when
the employer establishes to the satisfaction of the commissioner that
filing by an electronic method would create a hardship for the employer.
The quarterly wage reports shall be used by the commissioner to make
monetary determinations of claims for benefits.
Sec. 4. Section 48-649.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-649.01 (1) By December 1 of each calendar year, the commissioner
shall determine the state unemployment insurance tax rate for the
-12-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
following year based on information available through the department.
(2) If the state unemployment insurance tax rate is determined to be
zero percent pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the contribution
rate for all employers shall equal one hundred percent of the combined
tax rate.
(3) If the state unemployment insurance tax rate is not zero percent
as determined in this section, the combined tax rate shall be divided so
that not less than eighty percent of the combined tax rate equals the
contribution rate and not more than twenty percent of the combined tax
rate equals the state unemployment insurance tax rate except for
employers who are assigned a combined tax rate of five and four-tenths
percent or more. For those employers, the state unemployment insurance
tax rate shall equal zero and their combined tax rate shall equal their
contribution rate.
(4) On or before December 31 of each calendar year, the commissioner
shall designate the percentage and proportion of the state unemployment
insurance tax rate that shall be remitted to the Workforce Development
Program Cash Fund for the support of workforce development programs and
to the Business Innovation Cash Fund for the support of workforce
innovation programs. The department shall execute a memorandum of
understanding with the Department of Economic Development before
September 30 of each calendar year to ensure the commissioner receives
sufficient information regarding the current status of programs
administered under the Business Innovation Act, including any data
necessary for the commissioner to make an informed determination pursuant
to this section.
Sec. 5. Section 48-657, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-657 (1)(a) If any employer defaults in any payment of combined
tax or interest, the commissioner may make in any manner feasible and
cause to be filed as a secured transaction as provided in article 9,
-13-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
Uniform Commercial Code, and in the real estate mortgage records of any
county in which such employer is engaged in business or owns real or
personal property, a statement, under oath, showing the amount of
combined tax and interest in default, which statement, when filed for
record, shall operate as a lien and mortgage on all of the real and
personal property of the employer, subject only to the liens of prior
record, and the property of such employer shall be subject to seizure and
sale for the payment of such combined taxes and interest. Such lien on
personal property may be enforced or dissolved in the manner provided by
article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, and such liens on real estate may be
enforced or dissolved in the manner provided by Chapter 25, article 21,
in the enforcing and dissolving of real estate mortgages. This
subdivision shall only apply to liens filed prior to May 1, 1999.
(b) A lien for unpaid combined taxes filed or recorded pursuant to
subdivision (a) of this subsection shall lapse at the earlier of its
expiration date or the fifth anniversary of the filing or recording date,
unless the commissioner files a notice of continuation in the place of
the original filing or recording and with the appropriate filing officer
in the manner provided for in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and
Enforcement Act before such lien lapses. A notice of continuation shall
include all of the information required by the act, the date of the
filing or recording of the original lien, and a statement that the
original lien is to be continued for ten years. Thereafter, such lien
shall be enforced and notices of continuation filed in accordance with
the act.
(c) On and after May 1, 1999, if any employer defaults in any
payment of combined tax or interest, the commissioner may file a lien
against such employer in accordance with the Uniform State Tax Lien
Registration and Enforcement Act. Such liens shall set forth the amount
of combined tax and interest in default and shall be continued and
enforced as provided in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and
-14-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
Enforcement Act.
(2) It shall be the duty of the State of Nebraska, or any department
or agency thereof, county boards, the contracting board of all cities,
villages, and school districts, all public boards empowered by law to
enter into a contract by public bidding for the erecting and finishing or
the repairing of any public building, bridge, highway, or other public
structure or improvement, and any officer or officers so empowered by law
to enter into such contract to provide in such contract that the person,
persons, firm, or corporation to whom the contract is awarded will pay to
the Unemployment Compensation Fund of the State of Nebraska, the Business
Innovation Cash Fund, and the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund
unemployment combined tax and interest due under the Employment Security
Law on wages paid to individuals employed in the performance of such
contract.
(3) No contract referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall
be entered into by the State of Nebraska, a department or agency thereof,
an officer or officers, or a board referred to in such subsection unless
the contract contains the proviso mentioned in such subsection.
(4) Before final payment may be made on the final three percent of
any such contract awarded on or after June 1, 1957, the State of
Nebraska, department or agency thereof, officer or officers, or board
awarding the contract must have received from the contractor a written
clearance from the commissioner certifying that all payments then due of
combined tax or interest which may have arisen under such contract have
been made by the contractor or his or her subcontractor to the
Unemployment Compensation Fund.
(5) The final three percent of any such contract referred to in
subsection (4) of this section may be paid if the contractor has supplied
a bond with a satisfactory surety company guaranteeing full payment to
the Unemployment Compensation Fund, the Business Innovation Cash Fund,
and the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund of all combined tax and
-15-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
interest due under the Employment Security Law.
Sec. 6. Section 81-12,152, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,152 Sections 81-12,152 to 81-12,166 and section 9 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Business Innovation Act.
Sec. 7. Section 81-12,154, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,154 The purpose of the Business Innovation Act is to encourage
and support the transfer of Nebraska-based technology and innovation in
rural and urban areas of Nebraska in order to create high growth, high
technological companies, small businesses, and microenterprises and to
enhance creation of wealth and quality jobs. The Legislature finds that
the act will:
(1) Provide technical assistance planning grants pursuant to section
81-12,157 to facilitate phase one applications for the federal grant
program;
(2) Provide financial assistance pursuant to section 81-12,157 to
companies receiving phase one and phase two grants pursuant to the
federal grant program;
(3) Provide financial assistance pursuant to section 81-12,158 to
companies or individuals creating prototypes;
(4) Establish a financial assistance program pursuant to section
81-12,159 for innovation in value-added agriculture;
(5) Establish a financial assistance program for innovation in
biosciences;
(6) Establish a financial assistance program pursuant to section
81-12,160 to identify commercial products and processes;
(7) Provide financial assistance pursuant to section 81-12,161 to
companies using Nebraska public or private college and university
researchers and facilities for applied research projects;
(8) Provide support and funding pursuant to section 81-12,162 for
-16-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
microlending entities, microenterprise entities, and innovation hubs; and
(9) Provide support for locally owned and operated Nebraska-based,
high growth businesses by providing technical resources to foster
development, growth, and high wage creation. For purposes of this
subdivision, Nebraska-based, high growth business means a corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or limited
liability partnership registered with the Secretary of State that has two
to fifty employees and has annual sales of no less than five hundred
thousand dollars and no more than two million five hundred thousand
dollars; and .
(10) Establish that any entity receiving financial assistance under
the Business Innovation Act and that employs any person in this state,
whether or not such entity is subject to the Employment Security Law,
shall be required to submit to the Department of Labor quarterly wage
reports on such forms and in such manner as the Commissioner of Labor may
require.
Sec. 8. Section 81-12,155, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,155 In selecting projects to receive financial assistance
under the Business Innovation Act, the department shall develop a
qualified action plan by January 1 of each even-numbered year. The plan
shall set forth selection criteria to be used to determine priorities
which are appropriate to local conditions and the state's economy,
including the state's immediate need for innovation development, proposed
increases in jobs and investment, private dollars leveraged, industry
support and participation, and repayment, in part or in whole, of
financial assistance awarded under the act. The plan shall also include
selection criteria establishing that any entity applying for financial
assistance under the Business Innovation Act that employs any person in
this state, whether or not such entity is subject to the Employment
Security Law, shall be required to submit to the Department of Labor
-17-

LB1015 LB1015
2026 2026
quarterly wage reports on such forms and in such manner as the
Commissioner of Labor may require. The department shall submit the plan
to the Governor for approval.
Sec. 9. (1) The Business Innovation Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be used to carry out the Business Innovation Act, except that the
fund shall not be used for purposes of sections 81-12,155.01 and
81-12,163.01. The fund shall consist of deposits to the fund as required
by sections 48-648 and 48-649 to 48-649.04. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) Money in the fund shall be expended by the department for the
purpose of:
(a) Carrying out the Business Innovation Act, except that such money
shall not be expended for the purpose of carrying out the Bioscience
Innovation Program; and
(b) Payment of unemployment benefits if determined necessary by the
Commissioner of Labor.
(3) The department, or any entity with which the department
contracts for such purpose, may use up to five percent of any
appropriation from the fund for administrative expenses.
Sec. 10. Original sections 81-12,152, 81-12,154, and 81-12,155,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 48-602, 48-622.01,
48-648, 48-649.01, and 48-657, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-18-